District of Columbia statutes.
24-465

Conditions for geriatric release.

(a)

A geriatric inmate who is 65 years of age or older, has a chronic infirmity, illness, or disease, and who poses a low risk to the community, may be eligible for parole as determined by the Board.

(b)

Consideration for geriatric parole shall be initiated by the submission of an application from the Department, the inmate, or the inmate’s representative and the Department’s supporting documentation to the Board.

(c)

In determining eligibility for geriatric release, the Board shall take into consideration the following factors:

(1)

Age of inmate;

(2)

Severity of illness, disease, or infirmities;

(3)

Comprehensive health evaluation;

(4)

Institutional behavior;

(5)

Level of risk for violence;

(6)

Criminal history; and

(7)

Alternatives to maintaining geriatric long-term prisoners in traditional prison settings.

(d)

The Department shall submit an application for geriatric release with supporting documentation to the Board within 30 days of receipt of an application.

(e)

The Board shall make a determination whether to grant geriatric parole within 30 days of receipt of the application and supporting documentation from the Department.

History

May 15, 1993, D.C. Law 9-271, § 6, 40 DCR 792

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-265.